North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-01 Definitions and General Provisions
39-01-15.
Parking privileges for mobility impaired — Certificate — Revocation — Continuing appropriation — Penalty. [Effective September 1, 2022]

A mobility-impaired individual who displays prominently upon a motor vehicle parked by that individual or under that individual’s direction and for that individual’s use, the distinguishing certificate specified in subsection 4, license plates issued under section 39-04-10.2, or a disabled veteran plate issued under subdivision j of subsection 2 of section 39-04-18 is entitled to courtesy in the parking of the motor vehicle. However, any municipality may prohibit, by ordinance, parking on any highway for the purpose of creating a fire lane or to provide for the accommodation of heavy traffic during morning and afternoon rush hours. The privileges extended to a mobility-impaired individual do not apply on a highway if parking is prohibited.

A mobility-impaired individual as used in this section includes an individual who uses portable oxygen; requires personal assistance or the use of crutches, a wheelchair, or a walker to walk two hundred feet [60.96 meters] without rest; is restricted by cardiac, pulmonary, or vascular disease from walking two hundred feet [60.96 meters] without rest; has a forced expiratory volume of less than one liter for one second or an arterial oxygen tension of less than sixty millimeters of mercury on room air while at rest and is classified III or IV by standards for cardiac disease set by the American heart association; has an orthopedic, neurologic, or other medical condition that makes it impossible for the person to walk two hundred feet [60.96 meters] without assistance or rest; or is a disabled veteran issued a plate under subdivision j of subsection 2 of section 39-04-18.

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 319, § 6.

The director may issue a special identifying certificate to any mobility-impaired applicant upon submission by the applicant of a completed application and a written or electronic statement issued by a qualified physician, physician assistant, chiropractor, or an advanced practice registered nurse to the director that the applicant is a mobility-impaired person within the criteria of subsection 2. The director shall waive the requirement for a written or electronic statement from a qualified physician, physician assistant, chiropractor, or an advanced practice registered nurse if the applicant has previously submitted an application containing a certification from a qualified physician, physician assistant, chiropractor, or an advanced practice registered nurse that the applicant’s impairment is not reversible. The application must include the information required by the director. The physician’s, physician assistant’s, chiropractor’s, or advanced practice registered nurse’s statement must describe how the impairment limits the applicant’s mobility and daily life functions of the applicant. The certificate is valid for a period, not to exceed three years, as determined by the director. A physician, physician assistant, chiropractor, or an advanced practice registered nurse who provides a false statement that an individual is mobility impaired for the purpose of that individual obtaining a certificate under this subsection is guilty of an infraction for which a minimum fine of one hundred dollars must be imposed. A certificate issued under this subsection must be nine and one-half inches [24.13 centimeters] in height and three inches [7.62 centimeters] in width and must bear, in white on blue, the internationally accepted symbol of access for the mobility impaired. The certificate must bear the expiration date and registration number assigned by the director. The director shall adopt rules governing the issuance of the certificate. A temporary certificate, valid for an initial period not to exceed three months, may be issued by the director for a fee of three dollars upon application supported by a physician’s, physician assistant’s, chiropractor’s, or an advanced practice registered nurse’s statement. The director may issue a maximum of one additional temporary certificate for a fee of three dollars. The temporary certificate may be extended an additional period, not to exceed three months, upon application supported by a physician’s, physician assistant’s, chiropractor’s, or an advanced practice registered nurse’s statement that the extension is warranted. Temporary certificates must be the same size as other certificates issued under this section and must be white on red. The director may issue a maximum of one additional certificate, if the applicant does not have number plates issued under section 39-04-10.2 or under subdivision j of subsection 2 of section 39-04-18, to a mobility-impaired individual to whom a certificate has been issued under this subsection. The additional certificates may only be used by or on behalf of the mobility-impaired individual.

Except as provided in this subsection, two dollars of each fee for issuance of a certificate and one dollar of each fee for issuance of an additional certificate under this section must be deposited in the state highway department fund for purposes of defraying the cost of issuing the certificate. The rest of the fee, and the five dollar fee received for the issuance of an additional certificate under subsection 4, must be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the state rehabilitation council fund. The fees deposited in the fund are hereby appropriated on a continuing basis to the department of health and human services for use by the state rehabilitation council to accomplish the council’s statutory duties provided under section 50-06.1-16. If a certificate is lost, mutilated, or destroyed, the individual to whom the certificate was issued is entitled to a replacement. The individual shall furnish proof satisfactory to the director that the certificate has been lost, mutilated, or destroyed, and shall pay a replacement fee of three dollars.

A certificate issued under this section must be hung from the rearview mirror of the motor vehicle whenever the vehicle is occupying a space reserved for the mobility impaired and is being used by a mobility-impaired individual or another individual for the purposes of transporting the mobility-impaired individual. No part of the certificate may be obscured. A fee of five dollars may be imposed for a violation of this subsection.

An applicant may appeal a decision denying issuance of the certificate to the director. Written notice of the appeal must be received within ten business days following receipt by the applicant of notice of denial. The applicant has sixty days to provide additional supportive material to the director for purposes of deciding the appeal. The director shall affirm or reverse the decision to deny issuance of the certificate within thirty days after receipt of the supportive material. Written notice of the decision must be given to the applicant.

If a law enforcement officer finds that the certificate is being improperly used, the officer may report to the director any violation and the director may, in the director’s discretion, remove the privilege. An individual who is not mobility impaired and who exercises the privileges granted a mobility-impaired individual under subsection 1 is guilty of an infraction for which a fine of one hundred dollars must be imposed.

If a public or private entity designates parking spaces for accessible parking, the spaces must comply with the requirements of the Americans with Disabilities Accessibility Guidelines for Buildings and Facilities as contained in the appendix to title 28, Code of Federal Regulations, part 36 [28 CFR 36] and must be indicated by blue paint on the curb or edge of the paved portion of the street or parking lot adjacent to the space. In addition to blue paint, each reserved space must be indicated by a sign bearing the international symbol of accessibility for the mobility impaired. The sign must indicate that unauthorized use of the space is a nonmoving violation for which a fee of one hundred dollars must be imposed.

For any event, a public or a private entity temporarily may reserve additional accessible parking spaces for use by motor vehicles operated by a mobility-impaired individual. In that case, each temporarily reserved space must be indicated by a sign bearing the international symbol of accessibility for the mobility impaired at least four hours before the event.

A parking space clearly identified as reserved for the mobility impaired is considered designated and reserved for the mobility impaired and is sufficient basis for the enforcement of this section if the parking space has two of the following requirements:

Blue paint on the curb or edge of the paved portion of the street or parking lot adjacent to the space;

A sign bearing the international symbol of accessibility for the mobility impaired; or

Notice that unauthorized use of the space is a nonmoving violation for which a fee of one hundred dollars must be imposed.

Except for a temporarily reserved parking space for the mobility impaired, a sign posted must be immovable.

A law enforcement officer shall enforce this section in any parking lot or parking facility, whether publicly or privately owned.

If the designated parking spaces for mobility-impaired individuals are occupied or inaccessible, a motor vehicle displaying the distinguishing certificate specified in subsection 4, license plates issued under section 39-04-10.2, or a disabled veteran plate issued under subdivision j of subsection 2 of section 39-04-18 may park at an angle and occupy two standard parking spaces.

An individual may not stop, stand, or park any vehicle in any designated parking space that is reserved for the mobility impaired unless the vehicle displays a mobility-impaired identification certificate issued by the director to a mobility-impaired individual. A mobility-impaired individual may not permit the use of a certificate issued under this section by an individual who is not mobility impaired when that use is not in connection with the transport of the mobility-impaired individual. The registered owner of a vehicle may not allow that vehicle to be used in a manner that violates this subsection. Proof of intent is not required to prove a registered owner’s violation of this subsection. The registered owner, however, may be excused from a violation if the owner provides the citing authority with the name and address of the individual operating the vehicle at the time of the violation. A vehicle may temporarily use a space reserved for a mobility-impaired individual without a mobility-impaired certificate for the purpose of loading and unloading a mobility-impaired individual. A violation of this subsection is a nonmoving violation for which a fee of one hundred dollars must be imposed. Notwithstanding section 29-27-02.1, fifty percent of the fee imposed and collected under this subsection is appropriated on a continuing basis to the state rehabilitation council for the development of competitive and integrated employment opportunities.

A motor vehicle licensed in another state which displays a special authorized vehicle designation issued by the licensing authority of that state for vehicles used in the transportation of a mobility-impaired individual must be accorded the same privilege provided in this section for similar vehicles licensed in this state if the laws of the other state provide the same privileges to North Dakota motor vehicles displaying the special identifying certificate authorized in this section.

An entity that violates the requirements of subsection 9 is guilty of an infraction if the entity does not comply with subsection 9 within sixty days after receiving official notification of the violation.

The department shall issue a mobility-impaired parking permit for a vehicle owned and operated by care providers licensed by the state, veterans-related organizations, and other entities that regularly transport mobility-impaired individuals for use by those providers and entities to park in designated parking spaces while transporting mobility-impaired individuals.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 293, §§ 1 to 4; 1975, ch. 106, § 418; 1977, ch. 330, § 1; 1979, ch. 406, § 1; 1981, ch. 379, § 1; 1987, ch. 441, § 1; 1989, ch. 319, §§ 2, 6; 1989, ch. 443, § 1; 1991, ch. 395, § 1; 1991, ch. 396, § 1; 1993, ch. 261, § 2; 1993, ch. 376, § 1; 1995, ch. 363, § 1; 1995, ch. 458, § 1; 2001, ch. 328, § 1; 2005, ch. 322, § 1; 2013, ch. 283, § 1; 2013, ch. 373, § 1; 2015, ch. 258, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 335, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 257, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 303, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 304, §§
1, 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 352, effective September 1, 2022.

39-01-16.
Hearing on alleged violations.

Any person having information that a licensed dealer has violated any provisions of this title may file with the director an affidavit specifically setting forth such violation. Upon receipt of such affidavit, the director shall investigate the violation alleged in the affidavit. If, after investigation, the director determines that the dealer’s license will be revoked or suspended, a notice of intent to revoke or suspend the license must be mailed to the dealer by certified mail. The notice must provide the dealer with an opportunity for a hearing prior to the effective date of the license revocation or suspension. A record of such hearings must be made by stenographic notes or use of an electronic recording device.

If after such hearing the director finds the violation charged in the affidavit has been proved by the evidence, an order must be served on the licensee revoking or suspending the dealer’s license for a period of time to be determined by the director. Such action may be appealed to the district court by following the appeal procedure set forth in chapter 28-32, except that the order revoking or suspending the license is ineffective while the appeal is pending.

The director has the power to appoint an administrative hearing officer to conduct the hearing, administer oaths, and subpoena and examine witnesses. The administrative hearing officer shall submit the findings to the director for consideration and final decision.

Any witness called by the prosecution, except a peace officer while on duty, shall receive the same fees and mileage as a witness in a civil case in district court.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 415, § 1; 1995, ch. 364, § 1; 2001, ch. 329, § 1.

Cross-References.

Suspension or revocation of dealer’s license, grounds, see § 39-22-04.

39-01-17.
Authority to administer oaths and certify copies of records — Admissibility of records.

Officers and employees of the department designated by the director are, for the purpose of administering the motor vehicle laws, authorized to administer oaths and acknowledge signatures, and must do so without fee.

A certified copy of any record, electronic or original, maintained by the director relative to title 39 is admissible in any judicial proceedings or administrative hearing in the same manner as the original of the record.

In response to a subpoena, or upon the request of any appropriate government or judicial official, the director shall provide a duly certified copy of any book, paper, entry, record, or other document of that agency. This certified copy may consist of a photocopy or computer printout of the requested document certified by the director or a duly authorized representative.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 442, § 1; 1993, ch. 375, § 2.

39-01-18.
Dealer bond cancellation — Reinstatement — Revocation of license.

Any dealer required to be bonded by the provisions of title 39 whose bond is canceled by the surety company shall file a new bond with the department before the effective date of the cancellation. The effective date of a bond cancellation must be thirty days after notification by certified mail to the department from the surety company. Any dealer failing to maintain a current surety bond with the department shall return the dealer’s license and dealer’s plates to the department on or before the effective date of the cancellation. Failure to return the dealer’s license or dealer’s plates results in automatic revocation by operation of law. The department may order the superintendent to take possession of any dealer’s license or dealer’s plates not returned to the department as required in this section. The department shall reinstate the dealer’s license and dealer’s plates if a new bond is received within thirty days of the revocation.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 444, § 1.

39-01-19.
Permits for vending machines at rest areas. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

A vending machine that allows access to a tobacco product may not be placed or remain upon a rest area, and any other vending machine may not be placed or remain upon a rest area under the supervision of the director without a permit from the director. The director shall charge a fee for the issuance of a vending machine permit. The amount of the permit fee must relate to the department’s actual cost of administration, annual review, and enforcement of the permit process, but may not exceed twenty-five dollars annually. The permit process may not be affected by the content of a publication. The director shall require permittees to comply with appropriate indemnification, insurance, and other risk management provisions of the permit. Vending machines must be secured in a manner that prevents tipping and moving, deters theft, and leaves state property undamaged. Plexiglass, safety glass, or other shatter-resistant materials must be employed in windows or displays. All vending machines must be sufficiently enclosed to prevent the distributed product from inadvertently being removed or blown from the machine or weathered by the elements. Stolen or damaged vending machines do not result in liability to the department and must be repaired, restored, or replaced within thirty calendar days. All cashboxes and accesses to cashboxes must be metal and securely locked in place. All vending machines must be placed in a well-lighted area visible from the rest area roadway. All vending machines must be placed on a route allowing parallel access by motorized or standard wheelchairs, with at least sixty-six inches [1676.400 millimeters] of clear width. A vending machine may not have a component or function used by the public which requires more than five pounds [2.268 kilograms] of force to be applied. The height of controls, doors, or access points necessary for use by the public may not exceed sixty inches [1524 millimeters]. The director may determine the maximum number of vending machine placements at a given rest area. Priority must be given to vending machines placed pursuant to the Randolph Sheppard Act [Pub. L. 74-732; 49 Stat. 1559; 20 U.S.C. 107], as administered by the vocational rehabilitation division of the department of human services under section 50-06.1-13. When, after allowing for the placement of vending machines pursuant to the Randolph Sheppard Act [Pub. L. 74-732; 49 Stat. 1559; 20 U.S.C. 107], the director determines that the number of permit applications for a particular rest area would exceed the remaining available space or would prevent compliance with this section or other law, the director shall grant permits by means of a lottery, with permits allocated pro rata according to the number of applications for each type. The permittee is solely responsible to ensure that any trash, wrapping, boxes, or debris, generated when stocking or servicing vending machines is not left on or at the rest area. The permittee is solely responsible for all installation, maintenance, replacement, inspection, access area cleaning, and stocking of vending machines. Vandalism and graffiti on vending machines must be repaired or removed within fourteen days of written notice by the director. The permittee must inspect and stock vending machines as needed, but at least monthly, to provide adequate service to the public. Vending machines removed for repair or for other reasons must be restored or replaced by the permittee within thirty days. Vending machines in violation of this section or any other applicable law may be removed by the director fourteen days after notice of violation is provided and without liability to the director. Vending machines judged by the director to pose a risk to safety may be removed immediately without liability to the director and without prior notice to the permittee. The director shall retain any removed vending machines for thirty days to allow retrieval by the permittee, after compensation to the director for removal costs. The director may dispose of or sell machines not retrieved within thirty days of removal, but removal costs must be satisfied only to the extent of proceeds received by the director. The director has a cause of action to recover any deficiency, attorney’s fees, and litigation expenses. The director, upon the determination that a rest area must be closed for a period of greater than thirty days, may order the permittee, at the permittee’s expense, to remove all vending machines in a manner that does not damage state property, or remove all product and money and place upon the vending machine a prominent notice that all product and money have been removed. Should the director determine that removal of vending machines is necessary to conduct repairs, construction, surveys, or other duties of the department, the permittee, at the permittee’s expense, shall remove all vending machines in a manner that does not damage state property, upon fourteen days’ notice. The current address and telephone number where customer service or business is conducted by the permittee must be legibly and prominently posted upon the vending machine. The director shall cancel the permit should the permittee remove vending machines, except as provided in this section. The cost of any removal must be borne by the permittee. The permittee, at the permittee’s own expense, must restore the site the machine formerly occupied to the satisfaction of the director. For purposes of this section, “vending machine” means any device that allows access to a newspaper, magazine, beverage, concession, or other item for public consumption or use. For purposes of this section, “permittee” means any person or organization, including any corporation, partnership, firm, or any other legal entity capable of owning property and transacting business, which has applied for a permit under this chapter. For purposes of this section, “notice” consists of a written communication and must be deemed to have occurred within seventy-two hours of mailing, if mailed within North Dakota, or one hundred twenty hours of mailing, if mailed outside North Dakota. “Notice” to a vendor of the condition of a vending machine also occurs if a period of time greater than the required inspection interval for the vending machines has passed.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 331, § 1.

39-01-19.
Permits for vending machines at rest areas. [Effective September 1, 2022]

A vending machine that allows access to a tobacco product may not be placed or remain upon a rest area, and any other vending machine may not be placed or remain upon a rest area under the supervision of the director without a permit from the director. The director shall charge a fee for the issuance of a vending machine permit. The amount of the permit fee must relate to the department’s actual cost of administration, annual review, and enforcement of the permit process, but may not exceed twenty-five dollars annually. The permit process may not be affected by the content of a publication. The director shall require permittees to comply with appropriate indemnification, insurance, and other risk management provisions of the permit. Vending machines must be secured in a manner that prevents tipping and moving, deters theft, and leaves state property undamaged. Plexiglass, safety glass, or other shatter-resistant materials must be employed in windows or displays. All vending machines must be sufficiently enclosed to prevent the distributed product from inadvertently being removed or blown from the machine or weathered by the elements. Stolen or damaged vending machines do not result in liability to the department and must be repaired, restored, or replaced within thirty calendar days. All cashboxes and accesses to cashboxes must be metal and securely locked in place. All vending machines must be placed in a well-lighted area visible from the rest area roadway. All vending machines must be placed on a route allowing parallel access by motorized or standard wheelchairs, with at least sixty-six inches [1676.400 millimeters] of clear width. A vending machine may not have a component or function used by the public which requires more than five pounds [2.268 kilograms] of force to be applied. The height of controls, doors, or access points necessary for use by the public may not exceed sixty inches [1524 millimeters]. The director may determine the maximum number of vending machine placements at a given rest area. Priority must be given to vending machines placed pursuant to the Randolph Sheppard Act [Pub. L. 74-732; 49 Stat. 1559; 20 U.S.C. 107], as administered by the vocational rehabilitation division of the department of health and human services under section 50-06.1-13. When, after allowing for the placement of vending machines pursuant to the Randolph Sheppard Act [Pub. L. 74-732; 49 Stat. 1559; 20 U.S.C. 107], the director determines that the number of permit applications for a particular rest area would exceed the remaining available space or would prevent compliance with this section or other law, the director shall grant permits by means of a lottery, with permits allocated pro rata according to the number of applications for each type. The permittee is solely responsible to ensure that any trash, wrapping, boxes, or debris, generated when stocking or servicing vending machines is not left on or at the rest area. The permittee is solely responsible for all installation, maintenance, replacement, inspection, access area cleaning, and stocking of vending machines. Vandalism and graffiti on vending machines must be repaired or removed within fourteen days of written notice by the director. The permittee must inspect and stock vending machines as needed, but at least monthly, to provide adequate service to the public. Vending machines removed for repair or for other reasons must be restored or replaced by the permittee within thirty days. Vending machines in violation of this section or any other applicable law may be removed by the director fourteen days after notice of violation is provided and without liability to the director. Vending machines judged by the director to pose a risk to safety may be removed immediately without liability to the director and without prior notice to the permittee. The director shall retain any removed vending machines for thirty days to allow retrieval by the permittee, after compensation to the director for removal costs. The director may dispose of or sell machines not retrieved within thirty days of removal, but removal costs must be satisfied only to the extent of proceeds received by the director. The director has a cause of action to recover any deficiency, attorney’s fees, and litigation expenses. The director, upon the determination that a rest area must be closed for a period of greater than thirty days, may order the permittee, at the permittee’s expense, to remove all vending machines in a manner that does not damage state property, or remove all product and money and place upon the vending machine a prominent notice that all product and money have been removed. Should the director determine that removal of vending machines is necessary to conduct repairs, construction, surveys, or other duties of the department, the permittee, at the permittee’s expense, shall remove all vending machines in a manner that does not damage state property, upon fourteen days’ notice. The current address and telephone number where customer service or business is conducted by the permittee must be legibly and prominently posted upon the vending machine. The director shall cancel the permit should the permittee remove vending machines, except as provided in this section. The cost of any removal must be borne by the permittee. The permittee, at the permittee’s own expense, must restore the site the machine formerly occupied to the satisfaction of the director. For purposes of this section, “vending machine” means any device that allows access to a newspaper, magazine, beverage, concession, or other item for public consumption or use. For purposes of this section, “permittee” means any person or organization, including any corporation, partnership, firm, or any other legal entity capable of owning property and transacting business, which has applied for a permit under this chapter. For purposes of this section, “notice” consists of a written communication and must be deemed to have occurred within seventy-two hours of mailing, if mailed within North Dakota, or one hundred twenty hours of mailing, if mailed outside North Dakota. “Notice” to a vendor of the condition of a vending machine also occurs if a period of time greater than the required inspection interval for the vending machines has passed.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 331, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 353, effective September 1, 2022.